en: Clarinet Bells
xx: Clarinet Bells
cs: Korpusy pro klarinet
da: Klarinet – schallstykke
de: Klarinettentrichter
es: Campanas para clarinete
fr: Pavillons pour clarinettes
it: Campane per clarinetto
ja: クラリネット用ベル
nl: Klarinetbekers
no: Klarinett-endestykker
pl: Czary głosowe do klarnetów
pt: Campânulas para clarinete
ru: Раструбы для кларнетов
sv: Klockstycken till klarinetter
tr: Klarnet Kalakları

en: Clarinet Mouthpieces
xx: Clarinet Mouthpieces
cs: Hubičky pro klarinet
da: Klarinet – mundstykker
de: Klarinettenmundstücke
es: Boquillas para clarinete
fr: Becs de clarinette
it: Bocchini clarinetto
ja: クラリネット用マウスピース
nl: Mondstukken voor klarinet
no: Klarinett-munnstykker
pl: Ustniki do klarnetów
pt: Boquilhas para clarinete
ru: Мундштуки для кларнетов
sv: Munstycken till klarinetter
tr: Klarnet Bekleri

en: Clarinet Small Parts
xx: Clarinet Small Parts
cs: Drobné díly pro klarinet
da: Klarinet – smådele
de: Kleinere Klarinettenzubehörteile
es: Piezas pequeñas para clarinete
fr: Petites pièces pour clarinettes
it: Piccole parti clarinetto
ja: クラリネット用小型パーツ
nl: Kleine onderdelen voor klarinet
no: Smådeler til klarinett
pl: Drobne części do klarnetów
pt: Peças pequenas para clarinete
ru: Мелкие детали для кларнетов
sv: Smådelar till klarinetter
tr: Klarnet Küçük Parçaları

en: Clarinet Pegs & Stands
xx: Clarinet Pegs & Stands
cs: Podpěry a stojany na klarinet
da: Klarinet – stativer
de: Klarinettenhalter/-ständer
es: Soportes y clavijas para clarinete
fr: Supports pour clarinettes
it: Supporti per clarinetto
ja: クラリネット用ペグ・スタンド
nl: Statieven en standaards voor klarinet
no: Klarinettholdere og -stativer
pl: Wieszaki i stojaki na klarnety
pt: Apoios e suportes para clarinete
ru: Подставки и стойки для кларнетов
sv: Klarinettstativ
tr: Klarnet Sehpa ve Stantları

en: Clarinet Reeds
xx: Clarinet Reeds
cs: Klarinetové plátky
da: Klarinet – blade
de: Klarinettenblätter
es: Cañas para clarinete
fr: Anches pour clarinettes
it: Ance per clarinetto
ja: クラリネット用リード
nl: Klarinetrieten
no: Klarinettfliser
pl: Stroiki do klarnetów
pt: Palhetas para clarinete
ru: Трости для кларнетов
sv: Klarinettrör
tr: Klarnet Kamışları

en: Clarinet Straps & Supports
xx: Clarinet Straps & Supports
cs: Popruhy na klarinet
da: Klarinet – remme
de: Klarinettenriemen & -stützen
es: Soportes y cordones para clarinete
fr: Cordons et harnais pour clarinettes
it: Collarini/supporti clarinetto
ja: クラリネット用ストラップ
nl: Bandjes en steunen voor klarinet
no: Klarinettstropper og -støtter
pl: Paski i podpórki do klarnetów
pt: Cordões e suportes para clarinete
ru: Ремни и подставки для кларнетов
sv: Remmar och stöd för klarinetter
tr: Klarnet Askı ve Destekleri

en: Flute Accessories
xx: Flute Accessories
cs: Flétny – příslušenství
da: Tværfløjte – tilbehør
de: Flötenzubehör
es: Accesorios para flauta
fr: Accessoires pour flûtes
it: Accessori per flauto
ja: フルート用品
nl: Accessoires voor fluit
no: Fløytetilbehør
pl: Akcesoria do fletów
pt: Acessórios para flauta
ru: Принадлежности для флейт
sv: Flöjttillbehör
tr: Flüt Aksesuarları

en: Flute Care & Cleaning
xx: Flute Care & Cleaning
cs: Údržba a čištění flétny
da: Tværfløjte – pleje og rengøring
de: Flötenpflege & -reinigung
es: Limpieza y cuidado de la flauta
fr: Entretien et nettoyage des flûtes
it: Cura e pulitura flauto
ja: フルートお手入れ用品
nl: Onderhoud en reiniging van fluit
no: Fløytevedlikehold og -rengjøring
pl: Elementy konserwujące i czyszczące do fletów
pt: Manutenção e limpeza de flauta
ru: Средства для чистки флейт и ухода за ними
sv: Vård och rengöring av flöjter
tr: Flüt Bakım ve Temizliği

en: Flute Care Kits
xx: Flute Care Kits
cs: Soupravy pro údržbu flétny
da: Tværfløjte – rengøringssæt
de: Flötenpflegesets
es: Kits de mantenimiento para flautas
fr: Kits d'entretien pour flûtes
it: Kit pulizia flauto
ja: フルートお手入れセット
nl: Onderhoudskits voor fluit
no: Sett for fløytevedlikehold
pl: Zestawy do konserwacji fletów
pt: Kits de manutenção para flauta
ru: Принадлежности для ухода за флейтами
sv: Rengöringsset för flöjter
tr: Flüt Bakım Setleri

en: Flute Cleaning Rods
xx: Flute Cleaning Rods
cs: Čisticí hůlky na flétny
da: Tværfløjte – rensepinde
de: Flötenreinigungsstab
es: Escobillas para flautas
fr: Tiges écouvillons pour flûtes
it: Bacchette pulitura flauto
ja: フルート用クリーニングロッド
nl: Wisserstaven voor fluit
no: Fløyte-pussestaver
pl: Wyciory do fletów
pt: Varetas de limpeza para flauta
ru: Стержни для чистки флейт
sv: Flöjtviskor
tr: Flüt Temizleme Çubukları

en: Flute Swabs
xx: Flute Swabs
cs: Vytěráky pro flétny
da: Tværfløjte – renseklude
de: Flötenreinigungstücher
es: Limpiadores para flautas
fr: Écouvillons pour flûtes
it: Scovoli per flauto
ja: フルート用スワブ
nl: Doeken voor fluit
no: Fløyte-rensefiller
pl: Ściereczki do fletów
pt: Escovas de limpeza para flauta
ru: Шомполы для чистки флейт
sv: Torkdukar till flöjter
tr: Flüt Temizleme Harbileri

en: Flute Cases & Gigbags
xx: Flute Cases & Gigbags
cs: Kufry a pouzdra na flétny
da: Tværfløjte – tasker og gigbags
de: Koffer & Transporttaschen für Flöten
es: Fundas y estuches para flauta
fr: Étuis et housses pour flûtes
it: Custodie e gigbag flauti
ja: フルート用ケース・ギグバッグ
nl: Koffers en hoezen voor fluit
no: Fløytekofferter og -vesker
pl: Pokrowce i futerały na flety
pt: Estojos e gig bags para flauta
ru: Футляры и чехлы для флейт
sv: Etuier och gigbags för flöjter
tr: Flüt Çanta ve Kılıfları

en: Flute Parts
xx: Flute Parts
cs: Součásti flétny
da: Tværfløjte – dele
de: Flötenteile
es: Piezas para flauta
fr: Parties de flûte
it: Pezzi per flauto
ja: フルート用パーツ
nl: Onderdelen voor fluit
no: Fløytedeler
pl: Części fletów
pt: Peças para flauta
ru: Детали для флейт
sv: Flöjtdelar
tr: Flüt Parçaları

en: Flute Headjoints
xx: Flute Headjoints
cs: Flétnové hlavice
da: Tværfløjte – hovedstykker
de: Flötenkopfstücke
es: Cabezas para flautas
fr: Têtes de flûtes
it: Testate per flauto
ja: フルート頭部管
nl: Koppelstukken voor fluit
no: Fløyte-toppstykker
pl: Korony fletu
pt: Bocais para flauta
ru: Колена для флейт
sv: Flöjtmunstycken
tr: Flüt Ağızlıkları

en: Flute Small Parts
xx: Flute Small Parts
cs: Drobné součásti pro flétnu
da: Tværfløjte – smådele
de: Kleinere Flötenzubehörteile
es: Piezas pequeñas para flautas
fr: Petites pièces pour flûtes
it: Piccole parti flauto
ja: フルート用小型パーツ
nl: Kleine onderdelen voor fluit
no: Små fløytedeler
pl: Drobne części fletów
pt: Peças pequenas para flauta
ru: Мелкие детали для флейт
sv: Smådelar till flöjter
tr: Flüt Küçük Parçaları

en: Flute Pegs & Stands
xx: Flute Pegs & Stands
cs: Podpěry a stojany na flétnu
da: Tværfløjte – stativer
de: Flötenhalter & -ständer
es: Soportes y clavijas para flauta
fr: Supports pour flûtes
it: Supporti per flauto
ja: フルート用ペグ・スタンド
nl: Statieven en standaards voor fluit
no: Fløyteholdere og -stativer
pl: Wieszaki i stojaki na flety
pt: Apoios e suportes para flauta
ru: Подставки и стойки для флейт
sv: Flöjtstativ
tr: Flüt Sehpa ve Stantları

en: Harmonica Accessories
xx: Harmonica Accessories
cs: Harmoniky – příslušenství
da: Harmonika – tilbehør
de: Mundharmonikazubehör
es: Accesorios para armónica
fr: Accessoires pour harmonicas
it: Accessori per armonica
ja: ハーモニカ用品
nl: Harmonica-accessoires
no: Munnspill-tilbehør
pl: Akcesoria do harmonijek
pt: Acessórios para gaita
ru: Принадлежности для губных гармоник
sv: Munspelstillbehör
tr: Mızıka Aksesuarları

en: Harmonica Cases
xx: Harmonica Cases
cs: Pouzdra na foukací harmoniky
da: Harmonika – tasker
de: Mundharmonika-Etuis
es: Estuches para armónicas
fr: Étuis pour harmonicas
it: Custodie per armonica
ja: ハーモニカケース
nl: Harmonicakoffers
no: Munnspill-etuier
pl: Futerały na harmonijki
pt: Estojos para gaita
ru: Футляры для губных гармоник
sv: Munspelsfodral
tr: Mızıka Çantaları

en: Harmonica Holders
xx: Harmonica Holders
cs: Držáky na foukací harmoniky
da: Harmonika – holdere
de: Mundharmonikahalter
es: Soportes para armónica
fr: Supports pour harmonicas
it: Porta armonica
ja: ハーモニカホルダー
nl: Harmonicahouders
no: Munnspillholdere
pl: Uchwyty na harmonijki
pt: Suportes para gaita
ru: Ремешки для губных гармоник
sv: Munspelshållare
tr: Mızıka Tutucular

en: Oboe & English Horn Accessories
xx: Oboe & English Horn Accessories
cs: Hoboje – příslušenství
da: Obo – tilbehør
de: Oboenzubehör
es: Accesorios para oboe
fr: Accessoires pour hautbois
it: Accessori per oboe
ja: オーボエ用品
nl: Accessoires voor hobo
no: Obo-tilbehør
pl: Akcesoria do obojów
pt: Acessórios para oboé
ru: Аксессуары для гобоя
sv: Oboetillbehör
tr: Obua Aksesuarları